Utah statutes.
11-45-102.   Definitions.

As used in this section:

(1)  "Board" means the Board of the Utah Geological Survey.

(2)  "Energy code" means the energy efficiency code adopted under Section 15A-1-204.

(3) (a)  "Energy efficiency project" means:

(i)  for an existing building, a retrofit to improve energy efficiency; or

(ii)  for a new building, an enhancement to improve energy efficiency beyond the minimum required by the energy code.

(b)  "Energy efficiency projects" include the following expenses:

(i)  construction;

(ii)  engineering;

(iii)  energy audit; or

(iv)  inspection.

(4)  "Fund" means the Energy Efficiency Fund created in Part 2, Energy Efficiency Fund.

(5)  "Political subdivision" means a county, city, town, or school district.

